Missouri, session 2026, SB1737.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.1282, to read as
follows:
376.1282. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Enrollee", as defined in section 376.1350;
(2) "Health benefit plan", as defined in section
376.1350;
(3) "Health carrier", as defined in section 376.1350.
2. Each health carrier or health benefit plan that
offers or issues health benefit plans that are delivered,
issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on
or after August 28, 2026, shall provide enrollees coverage
for annual kidney function screening services designed to
identify patients at risk for chronic kidney disease.
Coverage for such screening services shall include, but is
not limited to, glomerular filtration rate testing, basic
metabolic panel testing, and urine testing for screening
albumin and creatinine levels.
✓